Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 53, section 2, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Grant Programs; Adult Mental Health Grants (8,900,000) 2,364,000 (a) Locked Intensive Residential Treatment Services. $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for start-up funds to intensive residential treatment services providers to provide treatment in locked facilities for patients meeting medical necessity criteria and who may also be referred for competency attainment or a competency examination under Minnesota Statutes, sections 611.40 to 611.59. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, subdivision 3, this appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (b) Engagement Services Pilot Grants. $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for engagement services pilot grants. Of this amount, $250,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for an engagement services pilot grant to Otter Tail County. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, subdivision 3, this appropriation is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . (c) Mental Health Innovation Grant Program. $1,321,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for the mental health innovation grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.4662. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, subdivision 3, this appropriation is available until June 30, 2026. (d) Behavioral Health Services For Immigrant And Refugee Communities. $354,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for a payment to African Immigrant Community Services to provide culturally and linguistically appropriate services to new Americans with disabilities, mental health needs, and substance use disorders and to connect such individuals with appropriate alternative service providers to ensure continuity of care. This is a onetime appropriation. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, subdivision 3, this appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (e) Base Level Adjustment. The general fund base is decreased by $1,811,000 in fiscal year 2026 and decreased by $1,811,000 in fiscal year 2027.